Washington statutes.
RCW 43.325.080

Electricity and biofuel usage goals—Rules.

(1) By June 1, 2010, the department shall adopt rules to define practicability and clarify how state agencies will be evaluated in determining whether they have met the goals set out in RCW 43.19.648(1). At a minimum, the rules must address:

(a) Criteria for determining how the goal in RCW 43.19.648(1) will be met by June 1, 2015;

(b) Factors considered to determine compliance with the goal in RCW 43.19.648(1), including but not limited to: The regional availability of fuels; vehicle costs; differences between types of vehicles, vessels, or equipment; the cost of program implementation; and cost differentials in different parts of the state; and

(c) A schedule for phased-in progress towards meeting the goal in RCW 43.19.648(1) that may include different schedules for different fuel applications or different quantities of biofuels.

(2) By June 1, 2015, the department shall adopt rules to define practicability and clarify how local government subdivisions of the state will be evaluated in determining whether they have met the goals set out in RCW 43.19.648(2). At a minimum, the rules must address:

(a) Criteria for determining how the goal in RCW 43.19.648(2) will be met by June 1, 2018;

(b) Factors considered to determine compliance with the goal in RCW 43.19.648(2), including but not limited to: The regional availability of fuels; vehicle costs; differences between types of vehicles, vessels, or equipment; the cost of program implementation; and cost differentials in different parts of the state; and

(c) A schedule for phased-in progress towards meeting the goal in RCW 43.19.648(2) that may include different schedules for different fuel applications or different quantities of biofuels.

[ 2011 c 353 s 5; 2007 c 348 s 204.]

NOTES:

Intent—2011 c 353: See note following RCW 36.70A.130.